Louisiana, session 2026, SB233.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart F of Part I of Chapter 1 of Subtitle 1 of Title 39 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 39:18.1 through 18.3, is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
SUBPART F. LOUISIANA STATEWIDE DATA EXCHANGE COMPACT
§18.1. Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact; authorization and
purpose
The office of technology services is authorized to create the Louisiana
Statewide Data Exchange Compact pursuant to the provisions of this Subpart.
The Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact shall establish a single legal
and technical framework for secure, privacy-compliant interagency data
sharing between the office of technology services and agencies as defined in this
Subpart. The Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact shall facilitate
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 233 ENROLLED
disclosure of confidential information and describe each participating agency's
rights and obligations with respect to confidential information and the limited
purposes for which each agency may use or have access to confidential
information.
§18.2. Definitions
As used in this Subpart, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Agency" means either of the following:
(a) A department, board, bureau, commission, office, authority, council,
or institution of state government.
(b) A state university or college, a community or technical college, or any
service or part of a state institution of higher education.
(2) "Data exchange" means the secure and structured process of sharing
information between agencies, involving transforming data into compatible
formats to ensure seamless transfer, interoperability, and usability, allowing
agencies to gain insights, improve operations, and foster collaboration.
(3) "Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact" means a collective
of data sharing and data security agreements entered into between participating
agencies and the office of technology services to facilitate an efficient and
consistent method of compliance with state and federal laws regarding data
sharing and data security.
§18.3. Administration of the Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact;
office of technology services
A. The office of technology services shall serve as the Louisiana
Statewide Data Exchange Compact administrator and shall develop a template
for the Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact.
B. The office of technology services shall establish a committee of
participating agencies that shall advise the office on the Louisiana Statewide
Data Exchange Compact and provide input on the establishment of the template
of the Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact. The committee shall
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 233 ENROLLED
review the Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact at least biannually to
correspond with any changes to state and federal laws and the evolving data
security landscape and shall report any recommended changes to the template
or any rules adopted pursuant to this Section to the office of technology services.
C. The use of the Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact by the
agency is voluntary and each participating agency at any time may determine
that the use of the Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact is no longer
appropriate for the specific data and may amend its agreement, terminate its
participation in the Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact, or pursue an
alternate approach to protecting data shared by the agency.
D. Each participating agency shall sign the Louisiana Statewide Data
Exchange Compact to serve as the primary governance document for the
safeguarding of data shared among agencies.
E. The Louisiana Statewide Data Exchange Compact shall specify that
the receiving agency shall establish, implement, and maintain administrative,
physical, and technical safeguards to preserve and maintain the confidentiality,
integrity, and availability of the confidential information disclosed to it by
another agency.
F. The office of technology services shall not acquire any ownership
rights or interest in data shared pursuant to the Louisiana Statewide Data
Exchange Compact. Each participating agency shall retain the ownership rights
of any data shared by the agency pursuant to the Louisiana Statewide Data
Exchange Compact.
G. The office of technology services shall promulgate rules, in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions
of this Subpart. Any proposed rules shall be submitted to the committee for
approval by a majority vote of the participating agencies prior to adoption and
implementation.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 233 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.